Maryland, session 2026, SB0608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
(P) (1) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–864(C) AND
(D) OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS IN THE
SAME MANNER THEY APPLY TO CARRIERS.
(2) A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION THAT DOES NOT COMPLY WITH
§ 15–864(C) AND (D) OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE SHALL BE SUBJECT TO A
MONETARY PENALTY OF UP TO $10,000 PER INSTANCE OF NONCOMPLIANCE AND AN
ADDITIONAL PENALTY OF $1,000 PER DAY FOR EACH DAY THE NONCOMPLIANCE
CONTINUES AFTER NOTIFICATION OF NONCOMPLIANCE FROM THE DEPARTMENT
TO THE MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION.
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE A MANAGED CARE
ORGANIZATION THAT DOES NOT COMPLY WITH § 15–864(C) AND (D) OF THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE TO SUBMIT AND IMPLEMENT A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN
WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A REQUEST FOR A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN
FROM THE DEPARTMENT.
(II) FAILURE TO IMPLEMENT A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN
REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY RESULT IN
ADDITIONAL ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS.
(4) A MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION SUBJECT TO A PENALTY UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION MAY REQUEST AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING UNDER TITLE 10,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(5) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT PERIODIC AUDITS AND
REVIEWS OF MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS TO DETERMINE COMPLIANCE WITH
THIS SUBSECTION.

SENATE BILL 608 3
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR
PATIENTS, PRESCRIBERS, AND LABORATORIES TO REPORT INSTANCES OF
NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxvii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, if providing coverage for the
delivery of anesthesia, shall provide coverage for the delivery of anesthesia in accordance
with § 15–862 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxviii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide calcium score
testing in accordance with § 15–863 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXIX) BEGINNING ON JULY 1, 2027, SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR SINGLE–GENE AND MULTIGENE PHARMACOGENOMIC TESTING IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–864 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PHARMACOGENOMIC TESTING” MEANS LABORATORY
GENETIC TESTING, INCLUDING SINGLE–GENE AND MULTIGENE PANEL TESTING,
CONDUCTED TO EVALUATE HOW AN INDIVIDUAL’S GENETIC PROFILE MAY IMPACT
THE EFFICACY, SAFETY, OR TOXICITY OF MEDICATIONS.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.

SENATE BILL 608
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
SINGLE–GENE AND MULTIGENE PHARMACOGENOMIC TESTING IF:
(1) THE PHARMACOGENOMIC TESTING IS ORDERED BY A TREATING
PROVIDER FOR AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE WITH A DIAGNOSIS OF DEPRESSION OR
ANXIETY; AND
(2) (I) THE PHARMACOGENOMIC TESTING IS USED TO GUIDE THE
SELECTION, DOSING, OR MANAGEMENT OF A MEDICATION FOR AN INDIVIDUAL; OR
(II) THE TREATING PROVIDER IS CONSIDERING A MEDICATION
CHANGE, DOSE ADJUSTMENT, OR AUGMENTATION AND THE MEDICATION UNDER
CONSIDERATION HAS A KNOWN GENE–DRUG INTERACTION;
(3) THE INDIVIDUAL IS BEING TREATED, OR IS EXPECTED TO BE
TREATED, WITH A MEDICATION FOR WHICH EVIDENCE–BASED PHARMACOGENOMIC
INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE DEMONSTRATING A CLINICALLY MEANINGFUL IMPACT
ON DRUG EFFICACY, SAFETY, OR RISK OF ADVERSE EVENTS;
(4) THE PHARMACOGENOMIC TESTING IS CONSISTENT WITH
GENERALLY ACCEPTED STANDARDS OF MEDICAL PRACTICE, INCLUDING CLINICAL
GUIDELINES, PEER–REVIEWED MEDICAL LITERATURE, OR DRUG LABELING
APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION;
(5) THE RESULTS OF THE PHARMACOGENOMIC TESTING ARE
INTENDED TO BE USED IN CLINICAL DECISION MAKING TO OPTIMIZE THERAPEUTIC
OUTCOMES, REDUCE THE LIKELIHOOD OF ADVERSE DRUG REACTIONS, OR AVOID
INEFFECTIVE THERAPY; AND
(6) THE PHARMACOGENOMIC TESTING IS COVERED BY THE FEDERAL
MEDICARE PROGRAM UNDER A NATIONAL OR LOCAL COVERAGE DETERMINATION
ISSUED BY A MEDICARE ADMINISTRATIVE CONTRACTOR.
(D) A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION REQUIREMENT IMPOSED FOR COVERAGE
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL PROVIDE A CLEAR AND MEANINGFUL PATHWAY FOR
COVERAGE THAT ENSURES TIMELY ACCESS TO THE COVERAGE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) SHALL REQUIRE ONLY THE MINIMUM NECESSARY
DOCUMENTATION FROM THE TREATING PROVIDER TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE
PATIENT MEETS THE CRITERIA FOR COVERAGE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION;

SENATE BILL 608 5
(3) SHALL ALLOW A SUFFICIENT AUTHORIZATION TIME FRAME
FOLLOWING THE COLLECTION OF A SPECIMEN FOR PHARMACOGENOMIC TESTING
FOR THE SUBMISSION OF A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION REQUEST AND CLAIMS RELATED
TO PHARMACOGENOMIC TESTING;
(4) SHALL ALLOW A PRIOR AUTHORIZATION REQUEST TO BE
SUBMITTED BY A TREATING PROVIDER OR A LABORATORY PROVIDER; AND
(5) MAY NOT IMPOSE UNDUE ADMINISTRATIVE BURDENS OR DELAYS
THAT CREATE BARRIERS TO CARE FOR AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE.
(E) (1) AN ENTITY THAT DOES NOT COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION SHALL
BE SUBJECT TO A MONETARY PENALTY OF UP TO $10,000 PER INSTANCE OF
NONCOMPLIANCE AND AN ADDITIONAL PENALTY OF $1,000 PER DAY FOR EACH DAY
THE NONCOMPLIANCE CONTINUES AFTER NOTIFICATION OF NONCOMPLIANCE
FROM THE COMMISSIONER TO THE ENTITY.
(2) (I) THE COMMISSIONER MAY REQUIRE AN ENTITY THAT DOES
NOT COMPLY WITH THIS SECTION TO SUBMIT AND IMPLEMENT A CORRECTIVE
ACTION PLAN WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A REQUEST FOR A CORRECTIVE
ACTION PLAN FROM THE COMMISSIONER.
(II) FAILURE TO IMPLEMENT A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN
REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY RESULT IN
ADDITIONAL ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS.
(3) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO A PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY
REQUEST AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING UNDER TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(F) (1) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL CONDUCT PERIODIC AUDITS AND
REVIEWS OF ENTITIES SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION TO DETERMINE COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR
PATIENTS, PRESCRIBERS, AND LABORATORIES TO REPORT INSTANCES OF
NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(D) THE FAILURE OF A CARRIER TO PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR A
PHARMACOGENOMIC TEST REQUIRED TO BE COVERED UNDER THIS SECTION
CONSTITUTES AN ADVERSE DECISION.

SENATE BILL 608
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026 January 1, 2027.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.